Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,134
Dwelling, defined.

Dwelling shall mean any building which is not an apartment house, lodging house, hotel, or mobile home and which contains one or two dwelling units which are, or are intended or designed to be, occupied for living purposes.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 3.